Maryland, session 2025, HB1136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 25. COMMUNITY–BASED RESIDENTIAL FACILITIES – PROVISION OF
LICENSING CRITERIA AND SINGLE POINT OF CONTACT.
24–2501.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1136*

HOUSE BILL 1136
(B) “COMMUNITY FACILITY” MEANS A COMMUNITY–BASED RESIDENTIAL
FACILITY:
(1) LICENSED UNDER:
(I) TITLE 7.5 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(II) TITLE 8 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(III) TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 22 OF COMAR; OR
(IV) TITLE 10, SUBTITLE 63 OF COMAR; OR
(2) SUBJECT TO TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 31 OF COMAR.
(C) “INTERESTED PARTY” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WITH A LEGITIMATE
INTEREST IN THE LICENSURE OF THE COMMUNITY FACILITY, INCLUDING A FAMILY
MEMBER OF A RESIDENT OF THE COMMUNITY FACILITY OR AN INDIVIDUAL LIVING
IN CLOSE PROXIMITY TO THE COMMUNITY FACILITY.
(D) “LICENSING AUTHORITY” MEANS A STATE AGENCY THAT ISSUES A
LICENSE FOR A COMMUNITY FACILITY.
24–2502.
(A) ON REQUEST, A LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL PROVIDE TO AN
INTERESTED PARTY THE CRITERIA USED BY THE LICENSING AUTHORITY TO
DETERMINE WHETHER TO ISSUE A LICENSE FOR OR RENEW A LICENSE OF A
COMMUNITY FACILITY.
(B) EACH LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL DESIGNATE A SINGLE POINT OF
CONTACT TO RESPOND TO COMPLAINTS, CONCERNS, OR ISSUES REGARDING A
COMMUNITY FACILITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.